Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-212.1.
(Effective July 1, 2024) Delivery of wine and beer; kegs; regulations of Board.

Any brewery, winery, or farm winery located within or outside the Commonwealth that is authorized to engage in the retail sale of wine or beer for off-premises consumption may deliver the brands of beer, wine, and farm wine produced by the same brewery, winery, or farm winery in closed containers to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal off-premises consumption.

Any person licensed to sell wine and beer at retail for off-premises consumption in the Commonwealth, and who is not a brewery, winery, or farm winery, may deliver the brands of beer, wine, and farm wine it is authorized to sell in closed containers to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal off-premises consumption. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such deliveries may be made to (i) a person’s vehicle if located in a designated parking area of the licensee’s premises where such person has electronically ordered beer, wine, or farm wine in advance of the delivery or (ii) such other locations as may be permitted by Board regulation.

Any person located outside the Commonwealth who is authorized to sell wine or beer at retail for off-premises consumption in its state of domicile, and who is not a brewery, winery, or farm winery, may apply for a delivery permit that shall authorize the delivery of any brands of beer, wine, and farm wine it is authorized to sell in its state of domicile, in closed containers, to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal off-premises consumption.

All such deliveries shall be to consumers within the Commonwealth for personal consumption only and not for resale. All such deliveries of beer, wine, or farm wine shall be performed by either (i) the owner or any officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee or permittee or (ii) a third-party delivery licensee pursuant to §

4.1-212.2

. The licensee performing the delivery shall be liable for any administrative violations of this section or §

4.1-304

committed during transport through completion of the delivery. Alcoholic beverages shall not be delivered after 11:00 p.m. or before 6:00 a.m. Only one individual may take possession of the beer, wine, or farm wine during the course of the delivery. No more than four cases of wine nor more than four cases of beer may be delivered at one time to any person in Virginia to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold, except that the licensee or permittee may deliver more than four cases of wine or more than four cases of beer if he notifies the Authority in writing at least one business day in advance of any such delivery, which notice contains the name and address of the intended recipient. Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, wine or beer sold for off-premises consumption or delivered pursuant to this section that are not in the manufacturer’s original sealed container shall (a) be enclosed in a container that has no straw holes or other openings and is sealed in a manner that allows a person to readily discern whether the container has been opened or tampered with subsequent to its original closure; (b) display the name of the licensee from which the wine or beer was purchased; (c) be clearly marked with the phrase “contains alcoholic beverages”; (d) have a maximum volume of 16 ounces per beverage; and (e) during delivery, be stored (1) in the trunk of the vehicle, (2) in an area that is rear of the driver’s seat, (3) in a locked container or compartment, or (4) in the case of delivery by bicycle, in a compartment behind the bicyclist.

The Board may adopt such regulations as it reasonably deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section. Such regulations shall include provisions that require (A) the recipient to demonstrate, upon delivery, that he is at least 21 years of age and (B) the recipient to sign an electronic or paper form or other acknowledgement of receipt as approved by the Board.

For purposes of §§

4.1-234

and

4.1-236

and Chapter 6 (§

58.1-600

et seq.) of Title 58.1, each delivery of wine or beer by a licensee or permittee shall constitute a sale in Virginia. The licensee or permittee shall collect the taxes due to the Commonwealth and remit any excise taxes monthly to the Authority and any sales taxes to the Department of Taxation, if such taxes have not already been paid.

Any manufacturer or retailer who is licensed to sell wine, beer, or both for off-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer in kegs, subject to any limitations imposed by Board regulation. The Board may impose a fee for keg registration seals. For purposes of this subsection, “keg registration seal” means any document, stamp, declaration, seal, decal, sticker, or device that is approved by the Board, designed to be affixed to kegs, and displays a registration number and such other information as may be prescribed by the Board.

History.

2007, cc. 99, 799; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2019, c. 706; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282; 2022, cc. 78, 79, 78, 79.

Section set out twice.

The section set out above is effective July 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective until July 1, 2024, see the preceding version of this section, also numbered
§

4.1-212.1

.

§ 4.1-212.2.
Third-party deliveries; limitations; penalties.

For the purposes of this section, “delivery personnel” means any employee, agent, or independent contractor of the third-party delivery licensee that engages in direct-to-consumer alcoholic beverage delivery on behalf of the third-party delivery licensee.

A third-party delivery license shall authorize the licensee to deliver alcoholic beverages to a consumer pursuant to an order for such alcoholic beverages placed with a licensee vested with delivery privileges. Except as otherwise permitted under §

4.1-212.1

, no person shall provide alcoholic beverage delivery services in the Commonwealth unless such person holds a third-party delivery license and is registered with the State Corporation Commission. All deliveries of alcoholic beverages by a third-party delivery licensee shall comply with the following: (i) alcoholic beverages shall be delivered only to persons who are 21 years of age or older and have provided valid identification that provides bona fide evidence of legal age, as prescribed in §

4.1-304

; (ii) the third-party delivery licensee shall verify at the time of delivery that the recipient is 21 years of age or older, ensure that the recipient’s identification bears a photograph that reasonably appears to match the appearance of the recipient, and record the recipient’s name and date of birth and the address to which the alcoholic beverages were delivered; (iii) alcoholic beverages shall not be delivered to any person whom the third-party delivery licensee knows or has reason to believe is intoxicated; (iv) except for deliveries made on behalf of the Authority, alcoholic beverages shall be delivered only for personal use and not for resale; (v) alcoholic beverages shall not be delivered to a correctional facility, a reformatory, a locker mailbox, a package shipping or storage facility, a retail licensee, or undergraduate housing at an institution of higher education; (vi) any alcoholic beverage that cannot be lawfully delivered shall be promptly returned to the licensed establishment at which the alcoholic beverage was purchased; (vii) only alcoholic beverages obtained directly from the licensed establishment with which the order was placed may be delivered; and (viii) the provisions of §

4.1-212.1

and any other requirements imposed on the delivery of alcoholic beverages by this subtitle or Board regulation.

In addition to the application requirements set forth in §

4.1-230

and any regulations or requirements adopted pursuant thereto, third-party delivery licensees shall provide to the Board, at the time of application and annually thereafter or as otherwise required by the Board, written certification that the third-party delivery licensee is in compliance with all applicable requirements set forth in Article 2 (§

46.2-2141

et seq.) of Chapter 21 of Title 46.2. Third-party delivery licensees shall also provide to the Board, upon request, a copy of any contracts entered into by the licensee with any person offering alcoholic beverages for delivery.

Third-party delivery licensees shall provide to the Board, at the time of application and annually thereafter or as otherwise required by the Board, written certification that all delivery personnel (i) prior to delivering alcoholic beverages and annually thereafter, have completed and passed with a score of no less than 80 percent a Board-approved public safety course; (ii) are 21 years of age or older; (iii) have a valid driver’s license, vehicle inspection, and vehicle registration; (iv) within the last seven years, have not been convicted of any of the following offenses under Virginia law or a substantially similar ordinance or law in any other jurisdiction: driving under the influence in violation of §

18.2-266

or

46.2-341.24

or a violation of §

4.1-304

,

18.2-36.1

,

18.2-51.4

,

18.2-95

,

18.2-357.1

, or

46.2-894

; (v) within the last three years, have not been convicted of more than three vehicle moving violations; and (vi) are not required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1 or listed on the U.S. Department of Justice’s National Sex Offender Public Website.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be required to pay (i) $2,500 for a first violation and (ii) $5,000 for any second or subsequent violation. The penalties provided under this subsection may be imposed in addition to or without imposing any other penalties or actions provided by law.

Notwithstanding subsection B, a third-party delivery licensee may deliver alcoholic beverages to a retail licensee if such alcoholic beverages are being delivered on behalf of the Authority.

History.

2022, cc. 78, 79.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall collect data regarding the compliance of third-party delivery licensees with the provisions of this act and report such data to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2023.”

Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 4 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall monitor the implementation of the provisions of this act to identify any difficulties of third-party delivery licensees in determining locations to which alcoholic beverages may be delivered and the adequacy of applicable training and education programs. The Board of Directors of the Authority shall promulgate regulations, if necessary, to address any issues identified during such monitoring process.”

§ 4.1-213.
Manufacture and sale of cider.

Any winery licensee or farm winery licensee may manufacture and sell cider to (i) the Board, (ii) any wholesale wine licensee, and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth.

Any wholesale wine licensee may acquire and receive shipments of cider, and sell and deliver and ship the cider in accordance with Board regulations to (i) the Board, (ii) any wholesale wine licensee, (iii) any retail licensee approved by the Board for the purpose of selling cider, and (iv) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Any licensee authorized to sell alcoholic beverages at retail may sell cider in the same manner and to the same persons, and subject to the same limitations and conditions, as such license authorizes him to sell other alcoholic beverages.

Cider containing less than seven percent of alcohol by volume may be sold in any containers that comply with federal regulations for wine or beer, provided such containers are labeled in accordance with Board regulations. Cider containing seven percent or more of alcohol by volume may be sold in any containers that comply with federal regulations for wine, provided such containers are labeled in accordance with Board regulations.

No additional license fees shall be charged for the privilege of handling cider.

The Board shall collect such markup as it deems appropriate on all cider manufactured or sold, or both, in the Commonwealth.

The Board shall adopt regulations relating to the manufacture, possession, transportation and sale of cider as it deems necessary to prevent any unlawful manufacture, possession, transportation or sale of cider and to ensure that the markup required to be paid will be collected.

For the purposes of this section:“Chaptalization” means a method of increasing the alcohol in a wine by adding sugar to the must before or during fermentation.“Cider” means any beverage, carbonated or otherwise, obtained by the fermentation of the natural sugar content of apples or pears (i) containing not more than 10 percent of alcohol by volume without chaptalization or (ii) containing not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume regardless of chaptalization. Cider shall be treated as wine for all purposes of this subtitle, except as otherwise provided in this subtitle or Board regulations.

This section shall not limit the privileges set forth in subdivision 8 of §

4.1-200

, nor shall any person be denied the privilege of manufacturing and selling sweet cider.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-27; 1978, c. 174; 1980, c. 324; 1992, c. 349; 1993, c. 866; 2011, cc. 265, 288; 2014, c. 787; 2015, c. 412; 2017, c. 160.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 265 and 288 are identical, and in subsection G, added the introductory language and the definition of “Chaptalization,” and inserted “carbonated or otherwise,” added clause (i) and the clause (ii) designation, and inserted “regardless of chapitalization” in the definition of “Cider.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 787 added subsection D and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in the definition of “Cider” under subsection H, inserted “or pears.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 substituted “and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth” for “(iii) any retail license approved by the Board for the purpose of selling cider, and (iv) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth” in subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 160 added the last sentence in the definition of “Cider” in subsection H.

§ 4.1-214.
Limitations on licenses; sale outside the Commonwealth.

No deliveries or shipments of alcoholic beverages to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth authorized by this chapter shall be made into any state the laws of which prohibit the consignee from receiving or selling the same.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-25, 4-27, 4-37; 1952, c. 535; 1956, cc. 520, 521; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 545, 627, 676, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 696, 698, 702, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, cc. 174, 190, 579; 1979, cc. 258, 537; 1980, cc. 299, 324, 526, 528, § 4-25.1; 1981, cc. 24, 410, 412, 586, 600; 1982, cc. 66, 214; 1983, c. 608; 1984, cc. 180, 200, 559, 703; 1985, cc. 457, 559; 1986, cc. 101, 190, 318, 615; 1987, cc. 252, 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, cc. 300, 390, 707, 810; 1991, cc. 468, 628; 1992, cc. 161, 215, 349, 350, 820; 1993, c. 866; 2017, c. 160.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 160 deleted “or cider as defined in §

4.1-213

” following “alcoholic beverages.”

§ 4.1-215.
Limitation on manufacturers, bottlers, and wholesalers; exemptions.

Unless exempted pursuant to subsection B, no retail license for the sale of alcoholic beverages shall be granted to any (i) manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not; (ii) officer or director of any such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler; (iii) partnership or corporation, where any partner or stockholder is an officer or director of any such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler; (iv) corporation which is a subsidiary of a corporation which owns or has interest in another subsidiary corporation which is a manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages; or (v) manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages who has a financial interest in a corporation which has a retail license as a result of a holding company, which owns or has an interest in such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages. Nor shall such licenses be granted in any instances where such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler and such retailer are under common control, by stock ownership or otherwise.
A. 1. Unless exempted pursuant to subsection B, no retail license for the sale of alcoholic beverages shall be granted to any (i) manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not; (ii) officer or director of any such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler; (iii) partnership or corporation, where any partner or stockholder is an officer or director of any such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler; (iv) corporation which is a subsidiary of a corporation which owns or has interest in another subsidiary corporation which is a manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages; or (v) manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages who has a financial interest in a corporation which has a retail license as a result of a holding company, which owns or has an interest in such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages. Nor shall such licenses be granted in any instances where such manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler and such retailer are under common control, by stock ownership or otherwise.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, a manufacturer of wine or malt beverages, or two or more of such manufacturers together, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not, may obtain a banquet license as provided in §

4.1-206.3

upon application to the Board, provided that the event for which a banquet license is obtained is (i) at a place approved by the Board and (ii) conducted for the purposes of featuring and educating the consuming public about wine or malt beverage products. Such manufacturer shall be limited to eight banquet licenses, whether or not jointly obtained, for such events per year without regard to the number of wineries or breweries owned or operated by such manufacturer or by any parent, subsidiary, or company under common control with such manufacturer. Where the event occurs on no more than three consecutive days, a manufacturer need only obtain one such license for the event.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, a manufacturer of distilled spirits, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not, may obtain a banquet license for a special event as provided in subdivision D 1 b of §

4.1-206.3

upon application to the Board, provided that such event is (i) at a place approved by the Board and (ii) conducted for the purposes of featuring and educating the consuming public about the manufacturer’s spirits products. Such manufacturer shall be limited to no more than eight banquet licenses for such special events per year. Where the event occurs on no more than three consecutive days, a manufacturer need only obtain one such license for the event. Such banquet license shall authorize the manufacturer to sell or give samples of spirits to any person to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold in designated areas at the special event, provided that (a) no single sample shall exceed one-half ounce per spirits product offered, unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits, and (b) no more than three ounces of spirits may be offered to any patron per day. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit such manufacturer from serving such samples as part of a mixed beverage.

This section shall not apply to:

Corporations operating dining cars, buffet cars, club cars, or boats;

Brewery, distillery, or winery licensees engaging in conduct authorized by subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

;

Farm winery licensees engaging in conduct authorized by subdivision 6 of §

4.1-206.1

;

Manufacturers, bottlers, or wholesalers of alcoholic beverages who do not (i) sell or otherwise furnish, directly or indirectly, alcoholic beverages or other merchandise to persons holding a retail license or banquet license as described in subsection A and (ii) require, by agreement or otherwise, such person to exclude from sale at his establishment alcoholic beverages of other manufacturers, bottlers, or wholesalers;

Wineries, farm wineries, or breweries engaging in conduct authorized by subsection F of §

4.1-206.3

or §

4.1-209.1

or

4.1-212.1

; or

One out-of-state winery, not under common control or ownership with any other winery, that is under common ownership or control with one restaurant licensed to sell wine at retail in Virginia, so long as any wine produced by that winery is purchased from a Virginia wholesale wine licensee by the restaurant before it is offered for sale to consumers.

The General Assembly finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages caused by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition and shall therefore be construed accordingly.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-32; 1978, c. 108; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 68, § 4-32.1; 1993, c. 866; 1995, cc. 456, 630; 2003, cc. 1029, 1030; 2005, c. 784; 2007, cc. 99, 799; 2013, cc. 266, 604; 2015, c. 604; 2016, cc. 132, 141; 2017, c. 159; 2018, c. 734; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 1029 and 1030 are identical, and twice inserted “or wine” in the second paragraph of subsection A; deleted “or” at the end of subdivision B 3; inserted “or” at the end of subdivision B 4; and added subdivision B 5.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 784, in the last paragraph of subsection A, inserted “whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not,” and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 99 and 799 are identical, and substituted “§

4.1-209.1

or

4.1-212.1

” for “§

4.1-112.1

” in subdivision B 5.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 266 substituted the clause designators (a) and (b) for clause designators (i) and (ii) in the second paragraph of subsection A; added subdivision B 6; and made a related change.

The 2013 amendment by c. 604 inserted “distillery” in subdivision B 2.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 604 added the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 132 and 141 are identical, and in the last paragraph in subsection A, inserted “unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits” in clause (A), substituted “three ounces of spirits” for “four spirits products” in clause (B), and inserted “part of” preceding “a mixed beverage” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 159 inserted the subdivision designations in subsection A and added subdivision A 2 b; rewrote subdivision A 2 a, which read “a manufacturer of malt beverages or wine, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not, may obtain a banquet license for a special event as provided in §

4.1-209

upon application to the Board provided that such event is (a) at a place approved by the Board and (b) conducted for the purposes of featuring and educating the consuming public about malt beverage or wine products. Such manufacturer shall be limited to no more than four banquet licenses for such special events per year. Where the event occurs on no more than three consecutive days, a manufacturer need only obtain one such license for the event.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 2 a, redesignated (a) and (b) as (i) and (ii); in subdivision A 3, redesignated former (1) and (2) as (i) and (ii); substituted “eight” for “four” preceding “banquet licenses”; inserted “sell or” preceding “give samples”; inserted “per day” following “any patron”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision A 2, deleted former subdivision A 2 a, pertaining to a banquet license for a manufacturer of malt beverages, deleted the subdivision A 2 b designation, inserted “or malt beverages, or two or more manufacturers together,” substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-209

,” inserted “or malt beverage” in clause (ii), and in the second sentence, inserted “whether or not jointly obtained” and “or breweries”; in subdivision A 3, substituted “subdivision D 1 b of §

4.1-206.3

” for “subdivision A 4 of §

4.1-210

” in the first sentence; in subdivision B 3, substituted “subdivision 6 of §

4.1-206.1

” for “subdivision 5 of §

4.1-207

”; in subdivision B 5, inserted “subsection F of §

4.1-206.3

or”; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Lease of farm winery premises to cooperative wholesaler. —

A farm winery is not prohibited from leasing a portion of its premises to a cooperative wholesaler or from leasing equipment to a wholesaler for use in its business. Additionally, a farm winery is not prohibited from employing the same persons employed by the cooperative wholesaler. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert S. Bloxom, Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, 06-019,
(4/18/06).